Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.442

Suicide assessment, treatment, and management training—Requirement for certain professionals—Exemptions—Model list of programs—Rules—Health profession training standards provided to the professional educator standards board.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1)(a) Each of the following professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least once every six years, complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(ii) A substance use disorder professional licensed under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW;

(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;

(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; and

(viii) A social worker associate—advanced or social worker associate—independent clinical licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

(b) The requirements in (a) of this subsection apply to a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions in (a) of this subsection.

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection:

(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section must complete the first training required by this section by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2014, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs later.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, the second training for a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical must be either: (A) An advanced training focused on suicide management, suicide care protocols, or effective treatments; or (B) a training in a treatment modality shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal, including dialectical behavior therapy, collaborative assessment and management of suicide risk, or cognitive behavior therapy-suicide prevention. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's second training prior to July 1, 2021, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection. This subsection (2)(a)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(a)(ii) is not reasonably available.

(b)(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section applying for initial licensure may delay completion of the first training required by this section for six years after initial licensure if he or she can demonstrate successful completion of the training required in subsection (1) of this section no more than six years prior to the application for initial licensure.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical exempt from his or her first training under (b)(i) of this subsection must comply with the requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection for his or her first training after initial licensure. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's first training after initial licensure, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection (2)(b)(ii). This subsection (2)(b)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(b)(ii) is not reasonably available.

(3) The hours spent completing training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education or continuing competency requirements for each profession.

(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt an individual professional from the training requirements in subsections (1) and (5) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (4)(a) allows a disciplining authority to provide blanket exemptions to broad categories or specialties within a profession.

(b) A disciplining authority may exempt a professional from the training requirements of subsections (1) and (5) of this section if the professional has only brief or limited patient contact.

(5)(a) Each of the following professionals credentialed under Title 18 RCW shall complete a one-time training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) A chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;

(ii) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) A licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or *advanced registered nurse practitioner, other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(iv) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, other than a holder of a postgraduate osteopathic medicine and surgery license issued under RCW 18.57.035;

(v) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under chapter 18.74 RCW;

(vi) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, other than a resident holding a limited license issued under RCW 18.71.095(3);

(vii) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(viii) A pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;

(ix) A dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;

(x) A dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(xi) An athletic trainer licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;

(xii) An optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(xiii) An acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(xiv) A dental therapist licensed under chapter 18.265 RCW; and

(xv) A person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (xiv) of this subsection.

(b)(i) A professional listed in (a)(i) through (vii) of this subsection or a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (vii) of this subsection must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2016, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between June 12, 2014, and January 1, 2016, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(ii) A licensed pharmacist or a person holding a retired active pharmacist license must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2017, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later.

(iii) A licensed dentist, a licensed dental hygienist, or a person holding a retired active license as a dentist shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2020, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between July 23, 2017, and August 1, 2020, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iii), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(iv) A licensed optometrist or a licensed acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, or a person holding a retired active license as an optometrist or an acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2021, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between August 1, 2020, and August 1, 2021, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iv), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (5)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(6)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide assessment, treatment, and management. Beginning July 1, 2021, for purposes of subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section, the model list must include advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal.

(b) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall update the list at least once every two years.

(c) By June 30, 2016, the department shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards for the training programs included on the model list. The minimum standards must require that six-hour trainings include content specific to veterans and the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means or self-injurious behaviors and that three-hour trainings for pharmacists or dentists include content related to the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means. By July 1, 2024, the minimum standards must be updated to require that both the six-hour and three-hour trainings include content specific to the availability of and the services offered by the 988 crisis hotline and the behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention system and best practices for assisting persons with accessing the 988 crisis hotline and the system. Beginning September 1, 2024, trainings submitted to the department for review and approval must include the updated information in the minimum standards for the model list as well as all subsequent submissions. When adopting the rules required under this subsection (6)(c), the department shall:

(i) Consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations; and

(ii) Consider standards related to the best practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the suicide prevention resource center.

(d) Beginning January 1, 2017:

(i) The model list must include only trainings that meet the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection and any three-hour trainings that met the requirements of this section on or before July 24, 2015;

(ii) The model list must include six-hour trainings in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, and three-hour trainings that include only screening and referral elements; and

(iii) A person or entity providing the training required in this section may petition the department for inclusion on the model list. The department shall add the training to the list only if the department determines that the training meets the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection.

(e) By January 1, 2021, the department shall adopt minimum standards for advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal. Beginning July 1, 2021, all such training on the model list must meet the minimum standards. When adopting the minimum standards, the department must consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations.

(7) The department shall provide the health profession training standards created in this section to the professional educator standards board as a model in meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.410.226 and provide technical assistance, as requested, in the review and evaluation of educator training programs. The educator training programs approved by the professional educator standards board may be included in the department's model list.

(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(9) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

(10) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) "Training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management" means empirically supported training approved by the appropriate disciplining authority that contains the following elements: Suicide assessment, including screening and referral, suicide treatment, and suicide management. However, the disciplining authority may approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for the profession in question based on the profession's scope of practice. The board of occupational therapy may also approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for occupational therapy practitioners based on practice setting.

(11) A state or local government employee is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

(12) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under chapter 71.24 RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

[2023 c 460 s 22; 2023 c 454 s 4. Prior: 2020 c 229 s 1; 2020 c 80 s 30; prior: 2019 c 444 s 13; (2019 c 444 s 12 expired August 1, 2020); 2019 c 358 s 5; (2019 c 358 s 4 expired August 1, 2020); 2017 c 262 s 4; 2016 c 90 s 5; 2015 c 249 s 1; 2014 c 71 s 2; prior: 2013 c 78 s 1; 2013 c 73 s 6; 2012 c 181 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

(2) This section was amended by 2023 c 454 s 4 and by 2023 c 460 s 22, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.

Effective date—2020 c 229 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect August 1, 2020." [2020 c 229 s 4.]

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Effective dates—2019 c 444 ss 13 and 19: "(1) Section 13 of this act takes effect August 1, 2020.

(2) Section 19 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026." [2019 c 444 s 32.]

Expiration dates—2019 c 444 ss 12 and 18: "(1) Section 12 of this act expires August 1, 2020.

(2) Section 18 of this act expires July 1, 2026." [2019 c 444 s 33.]

Effective date—2019 c 358 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect August 1, 2020." [2019 c 358 s 8.]

Expiration date—2019 c 358 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires August 1, 2020." [2019 c 358 s 7.]

Effective date—2017 c 262 s 4: "Section 4 of this act takes effect August 1, 2020." [2017 c 262 s 7.]

Findings—Intent—2017 c 262: "The legislature finds that over one thousand one hundred suicide deaths occur each year in Washington and these suicide deaths take an enormous toll on families and communities across the state. The legislature further finds that: Sixty-five percent of all suicides, and most suicide deaths and attempts for young people ages ten to eighteen, occur using firearms and prescription medications that are easily accessible in homes; firearms are the most lethal method used in suicide and almost entirely account for more men dying by suicide than women; sixty-seven percent of all veteran deaths by suicide are by firearm; and nearly eighty percent of all deaths by firearms in Washington are suicides. The legislature further finds that there is a need for a robust public education campaign designed to raise awareness of suicide and to teach everyone the role that he or she can play in suicide prevention. The legislature further finds that important suicide prevention efforts include: Motivating households to improve safe storage practices to reduce deaths from firearms and prescription medications; decreasing barriers to prevent access to lethal means by allowing for temporary and voluntary transfers of firearms when individuals are at risk for suicide; increasing access to drug take-back sites; and making the public aware of suicide prevention steps, including recognizing warning signs, empathizing and listening, asking directly about suicide, removing dangers to ensure immediate safety, and getting help. The legislature intends by this act to create a public-private partnership fund to implement a suicide-safer home public education campaign in the coming years." [2017 c 262 s 1.]

Effective date—2016 c 90 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect January 1, 2017." [2016 c 90 s 8.]

Findings—2016 c 90: "The legislature finds that: Washington's suicide rate is fourteen percent higher than the national average; on average, two young people between the ages of ten and twenty-four die by suicide each week; almost a quarter of those who die by suicide are veterans; and many of the state's rural and tribal communities have the highest suicide rates. The legislature further finds that when suicide occurs, it has devastating consequences for communities and schools, yet, according to the United States surgeon general, suicide is the nation's most preventable form of death. The legislature further finds that one of the most immediate ways to reduce the tragedy of suicide is through suicide awareness and prevention education coupled with safe storage of lethal means commonly used in suicides, such as firearms and prescription medications. The legislature further finds that encouraging firearms dealers to voluntarily participate in suicide awareness and prevention education programs and provide certain safe storage devices at cost is an important step in creating safer homes and reducing suicide deaths in the state." [2016 c 90 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2014 c 71; 2012 c 181: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) According to the centers for disease control and prevention:

(i) In 2008, more than thirty-six thousand people died by suicide in the United States, making it the tenth leading cause of death nationally.

(ii) During 2007-2008, an estimated five hundred sixty-nine thousand people visited hospital emergency departments with self-inflicted injuries in the United States, seventy percent of whom had attempted suicide.

(iii) During 2008-2009, the average percentages of adults who thought, planned, or attempted suicide in Washington were higher than the national average.

(b) According to a national study, veterans face an elevated risk of suicide as compared to the general population, more than twice the risk among male veterans. Another study has indicated a positive correlation between posttraumatic stress disorder and suicide.

(i) Washington state is home to more than sixty thousand men and women who have deployed in support of the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.

(ii) Research continues on how the effects of wartime service and injuries, such as traumatic brain injury, posttraumatic stress disorder, or other service-related conditions, may increase the number of veterans who attempt suicide.

(iii) As more men and women separate from the military and transition back into civilian life, community mental health providers will become a vital resource to help these veterans and their families deal with issues that may arise.

(c) Suicide has an enormous impact on the family and friends of the victim as well as the community as a whole.

(d) Approximately ninety percent of people who die by suicide had a diagnosable psychiatric disorder at the time of death, such as depression. Most suicide victims exhibit warning signs or behaviors prior to an attempt.

(e) Improved training and education in suicide assessment, treatment, and management has been recommended by a variety of organizations, including the United States department of health and human services and the institute of medicine.

(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to help lower the suicide rate in Washington by requiring certain health professionals to complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management as part of their continuing education, continuing competency, or recertification requirements.

(3) The legislature does not intend to expand or limit the existing scope of practice of any health professional affected by this act." [2014 c 71 s 1; 2012 c 181 s 1.]

Short title—2012 c 181: "This act may be known and cited as the Matt Adler suicide assessment, treatment, and management training act of 2012." [2012 c 181 s 4.]